Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.64.050

Partial recount requiring complete recount.

When a partial recount of votes cast for an office or issue changes the result of the election, the canvassing board or the secretary of state, if the office or issue is being recounted at his or her direction, shall order a complete recount of all ballots cast for the office or issue for the jurisdiction in question.

This recount will be conducted in a manner consistent with RCW 29A.64.021.

[ 2013 c 11 s 68; 2003 c 111 s 1605. Prior: 2001 c 225 s 7. Formerly RCW 29.64.035.]